Virginia statutes. Title 8.2. Commercial Code — Sales.
PART 7. Remedies.

§ 8.2-701.
Remedies for breach of collateral contracts not impaired.

Remedies for breach of any obligation or promise collateral or ancillary to a contract for sale are not impaired by the provisions of this title.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For comment on cumulative remedies under article 9 of the U.C.C., see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6. Pleading. § 6.03 Defendant’s Pleadings. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 23 Damages. § 23.10 Damages under the Uniform Commercial Code.
Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 31, 32.

§ 8.2-702.
Seller’s remedies on discovery of buyer’s insolvency.

Where the seller discovers the buyer to be insolvent he may refuse delivery except for cash including payment for all goods theretofore delivered under the contract, and stop delivery under this title (§

8.2-705

).

Where the seller discovers that the buyer has received goods on credit while insolvent he may reclaim the goods upon demand made within ten days after the receipt, but if misrepresentation of solvency has been made to the particular seller in writing within three months before delivery the ten day limitation does not apply. Except as provided in this subsection the seller may not base a right to reclaim goods on the buyer’s fraudulent or innocent misrepresentation of solvency or of intent to pay.

The seller’s right to reclaim under subsection (2) is subject to the rights of a buyer in ordinary course or other good faith purchaser or lien creditor under this title (§

8.2-403

). Successful reclamation of goods excludes all other remedies with respect to them.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note, “Inventory Lender As a Good Faith Purchaser for Value: Priority Problems in U.C.C. 2-702,” see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1351 (1986).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Bankruptcy, § 60; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 18, 24, 32.

§ 8.2-703.
Seller’s remedies in general.

Where the buyer wrongfully rejects or revokes acceptance of goods or fails to make a payment due on or before delivery or repudiates with respect to a part or the whole, then with respect to any goods directly affected and, if the breach is of the whole contract (§

8.2-612

), then also with respect to the whole undelivered balance, the aggrieved seller may

withhold delivery of such goods;

stop delivery by any bailee as hereafter provided (§

8.2-705

);

proceed under the next section [§

8.2-704

] respecting goods still unidentified to the contract;

resell and recover damages as hereafter provided (§

8.2-706

);

recover damages for nonacceptance (§

8.2-708

) or in a proper case the price (§

8.2-709

);

cancel.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 18, 32, 33; 5C M.J. Damages, § 18.

§ 8.2-704.
Seller’s right to identify goods to the contract notwithstanding breach or to salvage unfinished goods.

An aggrieved seller under the preceding section [§

8.2-703

] may

identify to the contract conforming goods not already identified if at the time he learned of the breach they are in his possession or control;

treat as the subject of resale goods which have demonstrably been intended for the particular contract even though those goods are unfinished.

Where the goods are unfinished an aggrieved seller may in the exercise of reasonable commercial judgment for the purposes of avoiding loss and of effective realization either complete the manufacture and wholly identify the goods to the contract or cease manufacture and resell for scrap or salvage value or proceed in any other reasonable manner.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article on mitigation of damages, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 967 (1983).

§ 8.2-705.
Seller’s stoppage of delivery in transit or otherwise.

The seller may stop delivery of goods in the possession of a carrier or other bailee when he discovers the buyer to be insolvent (§

8.2-702

) and may stop delivery of carload, truckload, planeload or larger shipments of express or freight when the buyer repudiates or fails to make a payment due before delivery or if for any other reason the seller has a right to withhold or reclaim the goods.

As against such buyer the seller may stop delivery until:

receipt of the goods by the buyer; or

acknowledgment to the buyer by any bailee of the goods except a carrier that the bailee holds the goods for the buyer; or

such acknowledgment to the buyer by a carrier by reshipment or as a warehouse; or

negotiation to the buyer of any negotiable document of title covering the goods.

To stop delivery the seller must so notify as to enable the bailee by reasonable diligence to prevent delivery of the goods.

After such notification the bailee must hold and deliver the goods according to the directions of the seller but the seller is liable to the bailee for any ensuing charges or damages.

If a negotiable document of title has been issued for goods the bailee is not obliged to obey a notification to stop until surrender of possession or control of the document.

A carrier who has issued a nonnegotiable bill of lading is not obliged to obey a notification to stop received from a person other than the consignor.

History.

1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 substituted “a warehouse” for “warehouseman” in subdivision (2)(c); and inserted “of possession or control” in subdivision (3)(c).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 18, 32.

§ 8.2-706.
Seller’s resale including contract for resale.

Under the conditions stated in §

8.2-703

on seller’s remedies, the seller may resell the goods concerned or the undelivered balance thereof. Where the resale is made in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner the seller may recover the difference between the resale price and the contract price together with any incidental damages allowed under the provisions of this title (§

8.2-710

), but less expenses saved in consequence of the buyer’s breach.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or unless otherwise agreed resale may be at public or private sale including sale by way of one or more contracts to sell or of identification to an existing contract of the seller. Sale may be as a unit or in parcels and at any time and place and on any terms but every aspect of the sale including the method, manner, time, place and terms must be commercially reasonable. The resale must be reasonably identified as referring to the broken contract, but it is not necessary that the goods be in existence or that any or all of them have been identified to the contract before the breach.

Where the resale is at private sale the seller must give the buyer reasonable notification of his intention to resell.

Where the resale is at public sale

only identified goods can be sold except where there is a recognized market for a public sale of futures in goods of the kind; and

it must be made at a usual place or market for public sale if one is reasonably available and except in the case of goods which are perishable or threaten to decline in value speedily the seller must give the buyer reasonable notice of the time and place of the resale; and

if the goods are not to be within the view of those attending the sale the notification of sale must state the place where the goods are located and provide for their reasonable inspection by prospective bidders; and

the seller may buy.

A purchaser who buys in good faith at a resale takes the goods free of any rights of the original buyer even though the seller fails to comply with one or more of the requirements of this section.

The seller is not accountable to the buyer for any profit made on any resale. A person in the position of a seller (§

8.2-707

) or a buyer who has rightfully rejected or justifiably revoked acceptance must account for any excess over the amount of his security interest, as hereinafter defined (subsection (3) of §

8.2-711

).

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

For comment on cumulative remedies under article 9 of the U.C.C., see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 18, 32, 33, 36.

§ 8.2-707.
“Person in the position of a seller.”

A “person in the position of a seller” includes as against a principal an agent who has paid or become responsible for the price of goods on behalf of his principal or anyone who otherwise holds a security interest or other right in goods similar to that of a seller.

A person in the position of a seller may as provided in this title withhold or stop delivery (§

8.2-705

) and resell (§

8.2-706

) and recover incidental damages (§

8.2-710

).

History.

1964, c. 219.

§ 8.2-708.
Seller’s damages for nonacceptance or repudiation.

Subject to subsection (2) and to the provisions of this title with respect to proof of market price (§

8.2-723

), the measure of damages for nonacceptance or repudiation by the buyer is the difference between the market price at the time and place for tender and the unpaid contract price together with any incidental damages provided in this title (§

8.2-710

), but less expenses saved in consequence of the buyer’s breach.

If the measure of damages provided in subsection (1) is inadequate to put the seller in as good a position as performance would have done then the measure of damages is the profit (including reasonable overhead) which the seller would have made from full performance by the buyer, together with any incidental damages provided in this title (§

8.2-710

), due allowance for costs reasonably incurred and due credit for payments or proceeds of resale.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article on mitigation of damages, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 967 (1983).

For article, “The Option Elements in Contracting,” see 90 Va. L. Rev. 2187 (2004).

§ 8.2-709.
Action for the price.

When the buyer fails to pay the price as it becomes due the seller may recover, together with any incidental damages under the next section [§

8.2-710

], the price

of goods accepted or of conforming goods lost or damaged within a commercially reasonable time after risk of their loss has passed to the buyer; and

of goods identified to the contract if the seller is unable after reasonable effort to resell them at a reasonable price or the circumstances reasonably indicate that such effort will be unavailing.

Where the seller sues for the price he must hold for the buyer any goods which have been identified to the contract and are still in his control except that if resale becomes possible he may resell them at any time prior to the collection of the judgment. The net proceeds of any such resale must be credited to the buyer and payment of the judgment entitles him to any goods not resold.

After the buyer has wrongfully rejected or revoked acceptance of the goods or has failed to make a payment due or has repudiated (§

8.2-610

), a seller who is held not entitled to the price under this section shall nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under the preceding section [§

8.2-708

].

History.

1964, c. 219.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Action for the price of materials. —

As a corporation’s specifically manufactured goods were identified prior to the time that a store claimed the corporation breached a contract, the corporation was entitled to recover the price of the materials and any incidental damages. Metwood, Inc. v. True Value Home Ctr., 61 Va. Cir. 664, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 321 (Roanoke Sept. 30, 2002).

§ 8.2-710.
Seller’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved seller include any commercially reasonable charges, expenses or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care and custody of goods after the buyer’s breach, in connection with return or resale of the goods or otherwise resulting from the breach.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Seller’s incidental damages. —

As a corporation’s specifically manufactured goods were identified prior to the time that a store claimed the corporation breached a contract, the corporation was entitled to recover the price of the materials and any incidental damages. Metwood, Inc. v. True Value Home Ctr., 61 Va. Cir. 664, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 321 (Roanoke Sept. 30, 2002).

§ 8.2-711.
Buyer’s remedies in general; buyer’s security interest in rejected goods.

Where the seller fails to make delivery or repudiates or the buyer rightfully rejects or justifiably revokes acceptance then with respect to any goods involved, and with respect to the whole if the breach goes to the whole contract (§

8.2-612

), the buyer may cancel and whether or not he has done so may in addition to recovering so much of the price as has been paid

“cover” and have damages under the next section [§

8.2-712

] as to all the goods affected whether or not they have been identified to the contract; or

recover damages for nondelivery as provided in this title (§

8.2-713

).

Where the seller fails to deliver or repudiates the buyer may also

if the goods have been identified recover them as provided in this title (§

8.2-502

); or

in a proper case obtain specific performance or replevy the goods as provided in this title (§

8.2-716

).

On rightful rejection or justifiable revocation of acceptance a buyer has a security interest in goods in his possession or control for any payments made on their price and any expenses reasonably incurred in their inspection, receipt, transportation, care and custody and may hold such goods and resell them in like manner as an aggrieved seller (§

8.2-706

).

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 26, 33; 19 M.J. Trover and Conversion, § 6.

§ 8.2-712.
“Cover”; buyer’s procurement of substitute goods.

After a breach within the preceding section [§

8.2-711

] the buyer may “cover” by making in good faith and without unreasonable delay any reasonable purchase of or contract to purchase goods in substitution for those due from the seller.

The buyer may recover from the seller as damages the difference between the cost of cover and the contract price together with any incidental or consequential damages as hereinafter defined (§

8.2-715

), but less expenses saved in consequence of the seller’s breach.

Failure of the buyer to effect cover within this section does not bar him from any other remedy.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article on mitigation of damages, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 967 (1983).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 33.

§ 8.2-713.
Buyer’s damages for nondelivery or repudiation.

Subject to the provisions of this title with respect to proof of market price (§

8.2-723

), the measure of damages for nondelivery or repudiation by the seller is the difference between the market price at the time when the buyer learned of the breach and the contract price together with any incidental and consequential damages provided in this title (§

8.2-715

), but less expenses saved in consequence of the seller’s breach.

Market price is to be determined as of the place for tender or, in cases of rejection after arrival or revocation of acceptance, as of the place of arrival.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note, “U.C.C. § 2-713: Anticipatory Repudiation and the Measurement of an Aggrieved Buyer’s Damages,” see 19 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 253 (1977).

For article on mitigation of damages, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 967 (1983).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For article, “The Option Elements in Contracting,” see 90 Va. L. Rev. 2187 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 33; 5C M.J. Damages, § 23; 19 M.J. Trover and Conversion, § 6.

§ 8.2-714.
Buyer’s damages for breach in regard to accepted goods.

Where the buyer has accepted goods and given notification (subsection (3) of §

8.2-607

) he may recover as damages for any nonconformity of tender the loss resulting in the ordinary course of events from the seller’s breach as determined in any manner which is reasonable.

The measure of damages for breach of warranty is the difference at the time and place of acceptance between the value of the goods accepted and the value they would have had if they had been as warranted, unless special circumstances show proximate damages of a different amount.

In a proper case any incidental and consequential damages under the next section [§

8.2-715

] may also be recovered.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For comment, “Virginia’s Lemon Law: The Best Treatment for Car Owner’s Canker,” see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 405 (1985).

For a note, “The Supreme Court’s Backwards Proportionality Jurisprudence:
Comparing Judicial Review of Excessive Criminal Punishments and Excessive Punitive Damages Awards,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1249 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 23, 33.

§ 8.2-715.
Buyer’s incidental and consequential damages.

Incidental damages resulting from the seller’s breach include expenses reasonably incurred in inspection, receipt, transportation and care and custody of goods rightfully rejected, any commercially reasonable charges, expenses or commissions in connection with effecting cover and any other reasonable expense incident to the delay or other breach.

Consequential damages resulting from the seller’s breach include

any loss resulting from general or particular requirements and needs of which the seller at the time of contracting had reason to know and which could not reasonably be prevented by cover or otherwise; and

injury to person or property proximately resulting from any breach of warranty.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

For article on mitigation of damages, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 967 (1983).

For comment, “Virginia’s Lemon Law: The Best Treatment for Car Owner’s Canker,” see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 405 (1985).

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 33, 34.

§ 8.2-716.
Buyer’s right to specific performance or detinue.

Specific performance may be decreed where the goods are unique or in other proper circumstances.

The decree for specific performance may include such terms and conditions as to payment of the price, damages, or other relief as the court may deem just.

The buyer has a right of detinue for goods identified to the contract if after reasonable effort he is unable to effect cover for such goods or the circumstances reasonably indicate that such effort will be unavailing or if the goods have been shipped under reservation and satisfaction of the security interest in them has been made or tendered. In the case of goods bought for personal, family, or household purposes, the buyer’s right of detinue vests upon acquisition of a special property, even if the seller had not then repudiated or failed to deliver.

History.

1964, c. 219; 1966, c. 392; 2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

This section conforms to section 2-716 in the uniform code, except that this section uses the term “detinue” where the uniform code uses the term “replevin.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1007, effective July 1, 2001, added the last sentence in subdivision (3).

Law Review.

For article on mitigation of damages, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 967 (1983).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 20, 33, 36.

§ 8.2-717.
Deduction of damages from the price.

The buyer on notifying the seller of his intention to do so may deduct all or any part of the damages resulting from any breach of the contract from any part of the price still due under the same contract.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Editor’s note.

Section 8-239, referred to in the Virginia Comment, was repealed by Acts 1977, c. 619.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 33.

§ 8.2-718.
Liquidation or limitation of damages; deposits.

Damages for breach by either party may be liquidated in the agreement but only at an amount which is reasonable in the light of the anticipated or actual harm caused by the breach, the difficulties of proof of loss, and the inconvenience or nonfeasibility of otherwise obtaining an adequate remedy. A term fixing unreasonably large liquidated damages is void as a penalty.

Where the seller justifiably withholds delivery of goods because of the buyer’s breach, the buyer is entitled to restitution of any amount by which the sum of his payments exceeds

the amount to which the seller is entitled by virtue of terms liquidating the seller’s damages in accordance with subsection (1), or

in the absence of such terms, twenty per cent of the value of the total performance for which the buyer is obligated under the contract or $500, whichever is smaller.

The buyer’s right to restitution under subsection (2) is subject to offset to the extent that the seller establishes

a right to recover damages under the provisions of this title other than subsection (1), and

the amount or value of any benefits received by the buyer directly or indirectly by reason of the contract.

Where a seller has received payment in goods their reasonable value or the proceeds of their resale shall be treated as payments for the purposes of subsection (2); but if the seller has notice of the buyer’s breach before reselling goods received in part performance, his resale is subject to the conditions laid down in this title on resale by an aggrieved seller (§

8.2-706

).

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note on lost profits for unestablished businesses and on whether or not Virginia should retain the new business rule, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 431 (1981).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 17, 26, 31.

§ 8.2-719.
Contractual modification or limitation of remedy.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section and of the preceding section [§

8.2-718

] on liquidation and limitation of damages,

the agreement may provide for remedies in addition to or in substitution for those provided in this title and may limit or alter the measure of damages recoverable under this title, as by limiting the buyer’s remedies to return of the goods and repayment of the price or to repair and replacement of nonconforming goods or parts; and

resort to a remedy as provided is optional unless the remedy is expressly agreed to be exclusive, in which case it is the sole remedy.

Where circumstances cause an exclusive or limited remedy to fail of its essential purpose, remedy may be had as provided in this act.

Consequential damages may be limited or excluded unless the limitation or exclusion is unconscionable. Limitation of consequential damages for injury to the person in the case of consumer goods is prima facie unconscionable but limitation of damages where the loss is commercial is not.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For note, “Legal Control on Warranty Liability Limitation Under the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 63 Va. L. Rev. 791 (1977).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

For essay, “Proposed Legislation: A (Second) Modest Proposal to Protect Virginia Consumers Against Defective Products,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 19 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 17, 26, 31.

§ 8.2-720.
Effect of “cancellation” or “rescission” on claims for antecedent breach.

Unless the contrary intention clearly appears, expressions of “cancellation” or “rescission” of the contract or the like shall not be construed as a renunciation or discharge of any claim in damages for an antecedent breach.

History.

1964, c. 219.

§ 8.2-721.
Remedies for fraud.

Remedies for material misrepresentation or fraud include all remedies available under this title for nonfraudulent breach. Neither rescission or a claim for rescission of the contract for sale nor rejection or return of the goods shall bar or be deemed inconsistent with a claim for damages or other remedy.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 34; 5C M.J. Damages, § 18.

§ 8.2-722.
Who can sue third parties for injury to goods.

Where a third party so deals with goods which have been identified to a contract for sale as to cause actionable injury to a party to that contract

a right of action against the third party is in either party to the contract for sale who has title to or a security interest or a special property or an insurable interest in the goods; and if the goods have been destroyed or converted a right of action is also in the party who either bore the risk of loss under the contract for sale or has since the injury assumed that risk as against the other;

if at the time of the injury the party plaintiff did not bear the risk of loss as against the other party to the contract for sale and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the recovery, his suit or settlement is, subject to his own interest, as a fiduciary for the other party to the contract;

either party may with the consent of the other sue for the benefit of whom it may concern.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 35.

§ 8.2-723.
Proof of market price; time and place.

If an action based on anticipatory repudiation comes to trial before the time for performance with respect to some or all of the goods, any damages based on market price (§

8.2-708

or §

8.2-713

) shall be determined according to the price of such goods prevailing at the time when the aggrieved party learned of the repudiation.

If evidence of a price prevailing at the times or places described in this title is not readily available the price prevailing within any reasonable time before or after the time described or at any other place which in commercial judgment or under usage of trade would serve as a reasonable substitute for the one described may be used, making any proper allowance for the cost of transporting the goods to or from such other place.

Evidence of a relevant price prevailing at a time or place other than the one described in this title offered by one party is not admissible unless and until he has given the other party such notice as the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5C M.J. Damages, § 23.

§ 8.2-724.
Admissibility of market quotations (subdivision (17) of Supreme Court Rule 2:803 derived from this section).

Whenever the prevailing price or value of any goods regularly bought and sold in any established commodity market is in issue, reports in official publications or trade journals or in newspapers or periodicals of general circulation published as the reports of such market shall be admissible in evidence. The circumstances of the preparation of such a report may be shown to affect its weight but not its admissibility.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the notation to the Virginia Rules of Evidence was added to the catchline of this section. Acts 2012, cc. 688 and 708, cl. 6 provides: “That pursuant to the authority set forth in §§ 30-146 and 30-147 of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Code Commission shall direct any party with whom the Virginia Code Commission contracts to publish the Code of Virginia to include in the catchline of every section of the Code of Virginia from which any rule contained in the Rules of Evidence has been derived a notation specifying such rule.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 36.

§ 8.2-725.
Statute of limitations in contracts for sale.

An action for breach of any contract for sale must be commenced within four years after the cause of action has accrued. By the original agreement the parties may reduce the period of limitation to not less than one year but may not extend it.

A cause of action accrues when the breach occurs, regardless of the aggrieved party’s lack of knowledge of the breach. A breach of warranty occurs when tender of delivery is made, except that where a warranty explicitly extends to future performance of the goods and discovery of the breach must await the time of such performance the cause of action accrues when the breach is or should have been discovered.

Where an action commenced within the time limited by subsection (1) is so terminated as to leave available a remedy by another action for the same breach such other action may be commenced after the expiration of the time limited and within six months after the termination of the first action unless the termination resulted from voluntary discontinuance or from dismissal for failure or neglect to prosecute.

This section does not alter the law on tolling of the statute of limitations nor does it apply to causes of action which have accrued before this act becomes effective.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Cross references.

As to effective date of act, see §

8.10-101

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on torts for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1501 (1971).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1501 (1978).

For article discussing statutes of limitation and repose in toxic substances litigation, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 247 (1982).

For article, “Products Liability and the Virginia Statute of Limitations — A Call for the Legislative Rescue Squad,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For 1987 survey of Virginia commercial law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 693 (1987).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assumpsit, § 33; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 5, 14, 36; 8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 311; 8B M.J. Food, § 10; 12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, §§ 19, 23, 43.